Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
PART 1 G ENERAL PROVISIONS
12-3-57. Legislative findings; historical and cultural museum assistance program; responsibilities.

As used in this Code section, the term:

"Commissioner" means the commissioner of community affairs.

"Department" means the Department of Community Affairs.

"Local jurisdiction" means any county or municipality in this state and any duly authorized agency or instrumentality of a county or municipality.

"Museum" means a facility in this state which is organized on a nonprofit basis for essentially educational or preservation purposes and which:

Owns or utilizes tangible inanimate objects of historical or cultural significance;

Is organized for the care of those objects and exhibits them to the public on a regular schedule; and

Interprets the state's cultural heritage or the state's history, natural history, or history of science and technology.

"Nonprofit organization" means a corporation, foundation, local jurisdiction, or other legal entity, no part of the net earnings of which inures to the benefit of any private shareholder or individual holding an interest in such entity.

"Program" means the historical and cultural museum assistance program established under subsection (e) of this Code section.

It is found and declared by the General Assembly that:

Historical and cultural heritage museums present, interpret, and preserve unusual and significant objects of this state's heritage for the benefit, enjoyment, and education of the citizens from every community in the state;

Historical and cultural heritage museums are unique and beneficial resources which supplement the state's educational system;

These museums are the repositories and caretakers of irreplaceable cultural items for the benefit not only of today's generation, but of those yet to come;

Museums, many of which are located in small communities, play an important and cost-effective role in the leisure time and tourism industry of this state; and

It is desirable that the entire history and heritage of the state be displayed and interpreted to the public where this happened, creating centers of community pride and dispersing tourist activity throughout the state.

The General Assembly declares that the public interest is served by the establishment of a program of financial and technical assistance to help historical and cultural heritage museums become more accessible to the citizens and visitors of this state and to assist the citizenry in better understanding its diverse cultural heritage by supporting the upgrade, care, research, interpretation, documentation, and display of the state's irreplaceable historical and cultural museum collections.

Pending appropriation of funding to conduct such, there is established a historical and cultural museum assistance program in the Department of Community Affairs to provide assistance to local jurisdictions and private nonprofit organizations for museums.

The department shall:

Manage, supervise, and administer the program; and

Coordinate the program with federal, state, or private programs that complement or facilitate carrying out the program.

The purpose of the program is to make grants to local jurisdictions and nonprofit organizations for use by museums for:

Research related to collections, exhibits, or other educational activities;

The care, conservation, interpretation, and documentation of collections;

The planning, design, and construction of exhibits;

Educational programs and projects;

The development of master plans for museums, including activities required to achieve accreditation by the American Association of Museums or other pertinent entity that provides museum accreditation;

The construction of minor structural modifications to existing museum facilities; and

The development of plans and specifications and the provision of architectural, engineering, or other special services directly related to the construction or rehabilitation of museum facilities.

Grants may not be made:

For routine administrative overhead expenses; or

To museums operated, in whole or in part, by this state.

In any fiscal year, the commissioner may allocate up to 20 percent of the total moneys appropriated for the program to be held in reserve for unanticipated projects that are eligible for assistance in accordance with paragraph (2) of subsection (d) of this Code section.

The department shall make grants to museums giving due consideration to equal geographic distribution throughout the state.

A grant may not exceed $10,000.00 to any single museum in any one year.

The department may not make a grant to a museum under this program unless the museum has been in existence as a nonprofit institution for at least five years prior to the date of application for the grant.

The department shall:

Conduct a survey to identify the locations, resources, and needs of museums in this state;

Provide technical and general advisory assistance to museums that qualify or seek to qualify for grants under the program; and

Encourage the development of long-range planning and accreditation by the American Association of Museums or other pertinent entity that provides museum accreditation and assists museums in meeting professional standards.

The department shall carry out the purposes of the program under provisions of Article 5 of Chapter 5 of Title 28, the "Fair and Open Grants Act of 1993," as amended.

The filing by the department with the Secretary of State under the provisions of Article 5 of Chapter 5 of Title 28, the "Fair and Open Grants Act of 1993," as amended, shall include:

Application procedures and review processes;

Procedures for adequate public notice of available assistance under the program; and

A set of selection criteria which the Department of Community Affairs shall consider in recommending approval of applications for grants and which must include:

The relative merits of the project or activities within identified state-wide needs;

The extent to which there is any contribution by the appropriate local jurisdiction to support the project being financed by the grant;

The potential for the project to stimulate increased tourism, attendance, or museum self-sufficiency; and

Other factors that may be relevant, such as the geographic distribution of grant assistance under the program.

(Code 1981, §

12-3-57

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 1037, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 4, § 12; Ga. L. 2020, p. 38, §§ 7, 8, 11/SB 473.)

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in paragraph (a)(1), substituted "Commissioner of the Department of Community Affairs" for "Director" and substituted "commissioner of the Department of Community Affairs" for "director of the Division of Historic Preservation of the department"; substituted "'Department of Community Affairs' means the Department of Community Affairs" for "'Division' means the Division of Historic Preservation of the department"; and substituted "Department of Community Affairs" for "division" in subsection (c) and in subparagraph (g)(2)(C).

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2020, "'Commissioner' means the commissioner of community affairs." was substituted for "'Commissioner' of the Department of Community Affairs' means the commissioner of the Department of Community Affairs." in paragraph (a)(1), and "'Department' means the Department of Community Affairs." was substituted for "'Department of Community Affairs' means the Department of Community Affairs." in paragraph (a)(2).

12-3-58. Powers, duties, and authority of the Department of Community Affairs; historic preservation grant program.

As used in this Code section, the term:

"Commissioner" means the commissioner of community affairs.

"Department" means the Department of Community Affairs.

"Grant fund" means the historic preservation grant fund created under subsection (b) of this Code section.

"Grant program" means the historic preservation grant program created under subsection (b) of this Code section.

"Historic property" means a district, site, building, structure, monument, or object significant in prehistory, history, upland and underwater archeology, architecture, engineering, or culture of this state, including artifacts, records, and remains related to a district, site, structure, or object. For purposes of this paragraph, sites significant in the history of this state shall be deemed to include without limitation combat veterans' gravesites in this state.

"Local jurisdiction" means any county or municipality in this state and any duly authorized agency or instrumentality of a county or municipality.

"Nonprofit organization" means a corporation, foundation, governmental entity, or other legal entity, no part of the net earnings of which inures to the benefit of any private shareholder or individual holding an interest in such entity.

"Preservation" means the identification, evaluation, recordation, documentation, curation, acquisition, protection, management, rehabilitation, restoration, stabilization, maintenance, and reconstruction of a historic property.

Pending appropriation of funding for such, there is created a historic preservation grant program to be administered by the Department of Community Affairs. The purpose of the grant program is to implement and encourage the preservation of historic properties as well as to promote interest in and study of such matters.

The Department of Community Affairs shall:

Manage, supervise, and administer the grant program; and

Coordinate the grant program with federal or state programs that complement or facilitate carrying out the grant program.

The grant program may be used to:

Make grants to nonprofit organizations and local jurisdictions for the purpose of acquiring, rehabilitating, or restoring historic properties;

Make grants to nonprofit organizations and local jurisdictions for the purpose of financing costs directly related to the rehabilitation or restoration project, which may include the costs of studies, surveys, plans and specifications, and architectural, engineering, or other special services;

Make grants to nonprofit organizations and local jurisdictions for the purpose of funding historic preservation education and promotion, including the research, survey, and evaluation of historic properties and the preparation of historic preservation planning and educational materials;

Fund the costs of state and local preservation revolving funds for the restoration or rehabilitation of historic properties for resale or lease subject to appropriate preservation covenants which may include costs directly related to restoration or rehabilitation, such as the costs of studies, surveys, plans, and specifications and architectural, engineering, or other special services;

Fund historic preservation education and promotion by the Department of Community Affairs, including the research, survey, and evaluation of historic properties and the preparation of historic preservation planning documents and educational materials; and

Fund the routine administration of the grant program.

The commissioner of the Department of Community Affairs shall approve each grant or expenditure of moneys from the grant fund.

Except for the emergency reserve allocation referred to in paragraph (3) of this subsection, the commissioner of the Department of Community Affairs decision on the granting of moneys from the grant fund to nonprofit organizations and local jurisdictions shall be based on a competitive selection process.

In any given fiscal year, the commissioner may allocate up to 20 percent of the total moneys available in the grant fund to be held in reserve for unanticipated emergency use in accordance with subsection (d) of this Code section.

In any given year, expenditures for routine administration of the grant program may not exceed 10 percent of the total moneys available in the grant fund.

The Department of Community Affairs shall:

Ensure that funding under the grant program for the acquisition, restoration, or rehabilitation of historic properties is used only if the property has been listed in or is eligible for the Georgia Register of Historic Places or is a combat veteran's gravesite in this state; and

Require recipients of grants made under the grant program to enter into an agreement to preserve, maintain, and allow limited public access to the historic property. This agreement shall be a recordable conservation easement for the purpose of preserving the historical aspects of the property if the property is real property, unless the commissioner has determined that such an agreement or easement is impracticable or infeasible under the circumstances in accordance with the regulations.

The department shall carry out the purposes of the grant program under provisions of Article 5 of Chapter 5 of Title 28, the "Fair and Open Grants Act of 1993," as amended.

In addition to provisions otherwise required by this Code section, the filing by the department with the Secretary of State under the provisions of Article 5 of Chapter 5 of Title 28, the "Fair and Open Grants Act of 1993," as amended, shall include the following:

Application procedures;

Procedures for adequate public notice of available assistance under the grant program;

Provisions for the review of plans and specifications and the inspection of projects during construction; and

A set of selection criteria which the Department of Community Affairs must consider in recommending approval of applications for grants and which must include:

The relative historical or cultural significance of, and urgency of need for, the project being financed with the grant;

The extent to which there is any proposed contribution by the appropriate local jurisdiction to support the project being financed with the grant; and

Other factors which may be relevant, such as the geographic distribution of grant assistance from the grant fund.

On or before December 31 of each year, the Department of Community Affairs shall report to the Governor and the General Assembly the financial status of the grant program and a summary of its operations for the preceding year.

(Code 1981, §

12-3-58

, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 1037, § 1; Ga. L. 2003, p. 566, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 2020, p. 38, §§ 5, 7, 8, 11/SB 473.)

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, rewrote paragraph (a)(1), which read: "'Director' means the director of the Division of Historic Preservation of the department."; rewrote paragraph (a)(2), which read: "'Division' means the Division of Historic Preservation of the department."; substituted "Department of Community Affairs" for "division" in subsections (b), (c), (d), (f), (g), and (h); substituted "commissioner of the Department of Community Affairs" for "director shall review and make recommendations to the commissioner who" in paragraph (e)(1); and substituted "commissioner of the Department of Community Affairs decision" for "director's recommendations to the commissioner" in paragraph (e)(2).

Cross references.

- Historic preservation generally, T. 44, C. 10.

Code Commission notes.

- Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1998, a misspelling of "archeology" was corrected
near the middle of paragraph (a)(5).

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2020, "'Commissioner' means the commissioner of community affairs." was substituted for "'Commissioner of the Department of Community Affairs' means the commissioner of the Department of Community Affairs." in paragraph (a)(1), and "'Department' means the Department of Community Affairs." was substituted for "'Department of Community Affairs' means the Department of Community Affairs." in paragraph (a)(2).